Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Chapter 8. Other Grants of Public Assistance.

§ 63.2-800.
Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 61, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to the Auxiliary grants program, see §

51.5-160

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

63.2-800

, relating to Auxiliary grants program; administration of program, was derived from 1973, c. 264, § 63.1-25.1; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1981, c. 21; 1985, c. 229; 1991, c. 532; 1993, cc. 957, 993; 1995, c. 649; 2002, c. 747; 2012, cc. 128, 387.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 65 provides: “That effective July 1, 2013, the regulations of the Board of Social Services promulgated pursuant to §

63.2-217

, related to administration of auxiliary grants pursuant to §

63.2-800

, and adult services provided pursuant to Article 1 (§

63.2-1600

et seq.) and adult protective services provided pursuant to Article 2 (§

63.2-1603

) of Chapter 16 of Title 63.2 shall be administered by the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services and shall remain in full force and effect until the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services promulgates regulations pursuant to the 64th enactment of this act.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 67 provides: “That as of July 1, 2012, the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall be deemed successor in interest to the Department for the Aging and the Department of Rehabilitative Services to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties. All right, title, and interest in and to any tangible personal property vested in the Department for the Aging and the Department of Rehabilitative Services to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties as of the effective date of this act shall be transferred to and taken as standing in the name of the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services.”

§ 63.2-801.
SNAP benefits program.

The Board is authorized, in accordance with the federal Food Stamp Act, to implement a SNAP benefits program in which each political subdivision in the Commonwealth shall participate. Such program shall include participation in the Restaurant Meals Program and shall be administered in conformity with the Board regulations.

To the extent authorized by federal law and regulations, the Board shall (i) establish broad-based categorical eligibility for SNAP benefits in accordance with 7 C.F.R. § 273.2(j)(2), (ii) set the gross income eligibility standard for SNAP benefits at 200 percent of the federal poverty guidelines, and (iii) not impose an asset limit for eligibility for SNAP benefits.

The Board shall increase opportunities for self-sufficiency through postsecondary education by allowing SNAP benefits program participants, to the greatest extent allowed by federal law and regulations, to satisfy applicable employment and training requirements through enrollment in an accredited public institution of higher education or other postsecondary school licensed or certified by the Board of Education or the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia. The Board shall (i) identify postsecondary education opportunities in the Commonwealth that meet the definition of “employment and training program” as set forth in 7 C.F.R. § 271.2 and the definition of “career and technical education” as set forth in 20 U.S.C. § 2302; (ii) average a SNAP benefits program participant’s classroom and study hours on a monthly basis to determine whether the SNAP benefits program participant has met applicable education hour requirements; (iii) deem a SNAP benefits program participant who is approved for a federal or state work study position but who has not yet been placed in a work study position to have satisfied applicable employment and training requirements, as permitted under federal law; (iv) create a standardized form and process for SNAP benefits program participants to verify compliance with education requirements; (v) allow accredited public institutions of higher education or other postsecondary schools licensed or certified by the Board of Education or the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia to apply for SNAP ET third party reimbursement designation through the established procurement process; and (vi) establish and make available to SNAP benefits program participants materials that provide clear guidance regarding satisfaction of employment and training requirements through postsecondary education.

History.

1974, c. 504, § 63.1-25.2; 1975, c. 311; 1981, c. 21; 2002, c. 747; 2020, c. 843; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 160.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 843, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall develop and implement a plan to begin participating in the Restaurant Meals Program (RMP) of the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program no later than January 1, 2021.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 843 inserted “include participation in the Restaurant Meals Program and shall” in the second sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 160, effective July 1, 2021, added the subsection A designation and substituted “SNAP benefits” for “food stamps” therein; and added subsections B and C.

§ 63.2-802.
Eligibility for general relief.

If a local board has exercised its option to establish a program of general relief, a person shall be eligible for such components of the general relief program as the locality chooses to provide if he is in need of general relief. The establishment of and continued participation in such general relief program shall be optional with the local board. Nothing contained in this section shall restrict the authority of a local board under §

63.2-314

. No person shall be deemed to be in need of general relief, however, if he fails to accept available employment which is appropriate to his physical and mental abilities and training, taking into consideration his home and family responsibilities which would affect his availability for employment. Prepaid funeral expenses, which do not exceed an amount established by the Board, shall not be considered a financial asset in determining a person’s eligibility for general relief.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-205; 1968, cc. 578, 666, § 63.1-106; 1972, c. 768; 1977, c. 241; 1980, cc. 18, 20; 2002, c. 747.

Cross references.

As to reimbursement of localities by the Commonwealth for certain expenditures, see §

63.2-401

.

As to authority of the State Board of Social Services upon amendments of the federal Social Security Act or regulations of the Department of Health and Human Services, see §

63.2-406

.

§ 63.2-803.
Payment for legal services in claims for Supplemental Security Income.

The Commissioner shall establish an advocacy project to assist recipients of general relief or children entrusted or committed to foster care who may be eligible for federal Supplemental Security Income (SSI) benefits in obtaining such benefits. Local departments may determine and refer appropriate potential SSI claimants to attorneys, or advocates working under the supervision of an attorney, for representation under this project. This project shall provide for disbursements to any such attorney or advocate upon receipt of a favorable decision in such referred claims.

Such disbursements shall be in an amount determined by the Board to be sufficient to ensure prompt and adequate representation of such recipients. This amount shall not exceed the lesser of the recoupment for state and local assistance paid, as provided by the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1383 (g), as amended, or twenty-five percent of the maximum federal back-due SSI grant payable to an individual.

Such disbursement shall be made upon submission by the attorney of a petition and a copy of the favorable decision. Petitions must be presented within sixty days of the favorable Social Security Administration decision.

The Board, in consultation with the Virginia State Bar, shall adopt regulations necessary to implement this section.

History.

1992, c. 170, § 63.1-89.1; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-804.
Eligibility to receive convict-made dentures.

Any person who is a recipient of dental care provided by the Department of Health is eligible to receive, if so prescribed, dentures manufactured in a state correctional facility.

History.

1972, c. 54, § 63.1-110.1; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-805.
Home Energy Assistance Program; report; survey.

The General Assembly declares that it is the policy of this Commonwealth to support the efforts of public agencies, private utility service providers, and charitable and community groups seeking to assist low-income Virginians in meeting their residential energy needs. To this end, the Department is designated as the state agency responsible for coordinating state efforts in this regard.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Home Energy Assistance Fund, hereinafter the “Fund.” Moneys in the Fund shall be used to:

Supplement the assistance provided through the Department’s administration of the federal Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program Block Grant; and

Assist the Commonwealth in maximizing the amount of federal funds available under the Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program and the Weatherization Assistance Program by providing funds to comply with fund-matching requirements, and by means of leveraging in accordance with the rules set by the Home Energy Assistance Program.

The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. The Fund shall consist of donations and contributions to the Fund and such moneys as shall be appropriated by the General Assembly. Interest earned on money in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes set forth in this section. The State Treasurer shall make expenditures and disbursements from the Fund on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Commissioner. Up to twelve percent of the Fund may be used to pay the Department’s expenses in administering the Home Energy Assistance Program.

The Department shall establish and operate the Home Energy Assistance Program. In administering the Home Energy Assistance Program, it shall be the responsibility of the Department to:

Administer distributions from the Fund;

Lead and facilitate meetings with the Department of Housing and Community Development, the Department of Energy, and other agencies of the Commonwealth, as well as any nonstate programs that elect to participate in the Home Energy Assistance Program, for the purpose of sharing information directed at alleviating the seasonal energy needs of low-income Virginians, including needs for weatherization assistance services;

Collect and analyze data regarding the amounts of energy assistance provided through the Department, categorized by fuel type in order to identify the unmet need for energy assistance in the Commonwealth;

Develop and maintain a statewide list of available private and governmental resources for low-income Virginians in need of energy assistance; and

Report annually to the Governor and the General Assembly on or before October 1 of each year through October 1, 2007, and biennially thereafter, on the effectiveness of low-income energy assistance programs in meeting the needs of low-income Virginians. In preparing the report, the Department shall:

Conduct a survey biennially in each year that the report is due to the General Assembly that shall collect information regarding the extent to which the Commonwealth’s efforts in assisting low-income Virginians are adequate and are not duplicative of similar services provided by utility services providers, charitable organizations and local governments;

Obtain information on energy programs in other states; and

Obtain necessary information from the Department of Housing and Community Development, the Department of Energy, and other agencies of the Commonwealth, as well as any nonstate programs that elect to participate in the Home Energy Assistance Program, to complete the biennial survey and to compile the required report. The Department of Housing and Community Development, the Department of Energy, and other agencies of the Commonwealth, as well as any nonstate programs that elect to participate in the Home Energy Assistance Program, shall provide the necessary information to the Department.The Department is authorized to assume responsibility for administering all or any portion of any private, voluntary low-income energy assistance program upon the application of the administrator thereof, on such terms as the Department and such administrator shall agree and in accordance with applicable law and regulations. If the Department assumes administrative responsibility for administering such a voluntary program, it is authorized to receive funds collected through such voluntary program and distribute them through the Fund.

Local departments may, to the extent that funds are available, promote interagency cooperation at the local level by providing technical assistance, data collection and service delivery.

Subject to Board regulations and to the availability of state or private funds for low-income households in need of energy assistance, the Department is authorized to:

Receive state and private funds for such services; and

Disburse funds to state agencies, and vendors of energy services, to provide energy assistance programs for low-income households.

Actions of the Department relating to the review, allocation and awarding of benefits and grants shall be exempt from the provisions of Article 3 (§

2.2-4018

et seq.) and Article 4 (§

2.2-4024

et seq.) of Chapter 40 of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

No employee or former employee of the Department shall divulge any information acquired by him in the performance of his duties with respect to the income or assistance eligibility of any individual or household obtained in the course of administering the Home Energy Assistance Program, except in accordance with proper judicial order. The provisions of this section shall not apply to (i) acts performed or words spoken or published in the line of duty under law; (ii) inquiries and investigations to obtain information as to the implementation of this chapter by a duly constituted committee of the General Assembly, or when such inquiry or investigation is relevant to its study, provided that any such information shall be privileged; or (iii) the publication of statistics so classified as to prevent the identification of any individual or household.

History.

2001, c. 676, §§ 63.1-336, 63.1-337, 63.1-338, 63.1-339, 63.1-340, 63.1-341, 63.1-342, 63.1-343, 63.1-339; 2002, cc. 243, 747; 2007, c. 312; 2009, c. 127; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532.

Cross references.

As to voluntary contributions of tax refunds, see §

58.1-344.3

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 243 amended § 63.1-339, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2002, c. 243 has been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2002 amendment by c. 243, in subsection C, redesignated former subdivision 2 as present subdivision 5, inserted present subdivisions 2 through 4, and in present present subdivision 5, added the language beginning “In preparing the annual report” at the end of the introductory paragraph and added subdivisions a. through c. and the following paragraph.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 312, in subdivision C 5, inserted “through October 1, 2007, and biennially thereafter,” deleted “annual” before “report” in subdivisions C 5 and C 5 c; and deleted the second paragraph of subdivision C 5 c, concerning cessation of reporting requirements October 1, 2007.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 127 substituted “in each year that the report is due to the General Assembly” for “beginning in 2002” in paragraph C 5 a.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021, in subdivision C 2 and twice in subdivision C 5 c, substituted “Department of Energy” for “Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy.”

§ 63.2-806.
Unaccompanied homeless youths; services; consent.

As used in this section,

“Provider”
means any person or organization that provides housing, including emergency shelter, or other services to an unaccompanied homeless youth and that receives funding from the Virginia Homeless Solutions Program or any other grant program administered by the Homeless and Special Needs Housing unit of the Department of Housing and Community Development.

“Unaccompanied homeless youth”
means a homeless child or youth described in subdivision A 7 of § 22.1-3 who is not in the physical custody of a parent or guardian.

A child who is 14 years of age or older and who is an unaccompanied homeless youth as evidenced by a statement so stating and signed by an employee of any local education agency who serves as a liaison for homeless children and youths designated pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii) shall be deemed an adult for the purpose of consenting to housing or other services provided in accordance with this section for himself or his minor child. A child who is 14 years of age or older who is an unaccompanied homeless youth who cannot produce a statement signed by an employee of any local education agency who serves as a liaison for homeless children and youths designated pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii) shall be deemed an adult for the purpose of consenting to housing or other services provided in accordance with this section for himself or his minor child for a period of up to 72 hours.

A provider that provides housing services, including emergency shelter, to an unaccompanied homeless youth shall attempt to contact the parents or guardian of such unaccompanied homeless youth to inform them of the whereabouts of such unaccompanied homeless youth. If the provider is unable to contact the parent or guardian of the unaccompanied homeless youth or if the provider determines that contacting the parent or guardian is not in the best interests of the youth, the provider shall (i) document the steps taken to identify and notify the parent or guardian or the reasons for the determination that contact with the parent or guardian is not in the best interests of the unaccompanied homeless youth and (ii) immediately notify the local department of social services of the whereabouts of the child. The provider shall report the child’s presence to local law enforcement and the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children in order to determine whether the child has been reported missing or the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children has a record of the child being reported missing by a legal guardian. The provider shall retain such documentation for a period of not less than five years.

Any person who, in good faith, relies upon a written statement described in subsection B shall not be liable in any civil or criminal action for delivering services to an unaccompanied homeless youth pursuant to this section without the consent of his parent or guardian, provided that such provider has complied with the requirements of this section. However, no provider shall be relieved of liability for any negligent or criminal acts on the basis of this section.

The Board shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

2022, c. 801.